Washington statutes.
RCW 24.36.420

When title passes on sale by member to association.

If the members contract a sale to the association, it shall be conclusively held that title to the products passes absolutely and unreservedly, except for recorded liens, to the association upon delivery or at any other time expressly and definitely specified in the contract.

[ 1959 c 312 s 42.]